Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 51 Transfers Of Property
28-51-301. Sale, mortgage, or lease.

Upon petition of a personal representative, the court having jurisdiction of the administration of the estate may order the sale, mortgage, or lease of real property of the estate, or timber thereon located, or oil, gas, or other minerals or mineral rights or interests appertaining thereto, or any part of or interest in the property, wherever situated in this state.

The court may authorize the execution of any contract relating to, or conveyance or transfer of, any such property, right, or interest, containing such customary or desirable provisions with reference thereto, as the court shall find to be for the best interest of the estate.

The petition shall set forth the reasons for the application and describe the property or right or interest involved and the terms of the contract, conveyance, or transfer for which authority is sought and shall include a description of the bond of the personal representative and a statement of the facts essential to determine its sufficiency.

Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall fix the time and place for the hearing. Notice of the hearing stating the nature of the application shall be given to such interested persons as the court may direct in the manner provided in § 28-1-112, unless the value of the interest to be sold, mortgaged, or leased is not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), in which case the court, at its discretion, may hear the petition without notice.

At the hearing and upon satisfactory proof, the court may order the sale, mortgage, or lease of the property described or any part thereof or right or interest therein.

At the discretion of the court, real property encumbered by a lien may be ordered sold subject to the lien.

Ark. L. Rev.

Probate Code Amendments, 5 Ark. L. Rev. 377.

Notices Under the Probate Code, 8 Ark. L. Rev. 324.

An administrator had no authority to sell real estate except as provided by statute. Burgauer v. Laird, 26 Ark. 256 (1870) (decision under prior law).

The administrator of an estate had no interest in the lands of an intestate and no control over them except for the benefit of creditors and heirs and under the direction of the court. Kiernan v. Blackwell, 27 Ark. 235 (1871) (decision under prior law).

A sale of the real estate of a deceased person made under an order of a court conveyed legal title though the proceedings may have been irregular, where the court had jurisdiction of the subject-matter. Bennett v. Owen, 13 Ark. (8 English) 177 (1852) (decision under prior law).

With a petition of an administrator for the sale of real estate under this section for the purpose of making distribution pending in the probate court, the chancery court had no jurisdiction to order a sale in a partition action filed by one of the heirs. Doss v. Taylor, 244 Ark. 252, 424 S.W.2d 541 (1968).

Where an application was made to a court by an administrator for an order to sell real estate, any person interested in the subject-matter could, on a proper showing to the court, make himself a party to the proceeding and appeal therefrom. Ex parte Marr, 12 Ark.84 (1851) (decision under prior law).

On petition to probate court to set aside order authorizing sale of decedent's land, where petitioners were not heirs or creditors, where their petition did not assert any claim against the estate or declare any interest in the estate's property, and where they did not indicate any entitlement to proceeds which might be distributed by the estate, but in fact were persons against whom the estate had sought relief, the petitioners were not interested persons as defined by §28-1-102(a)(11) and had no standing to question the issuance of the court's order. White v. Welsh, 323 Ark. 479, 915 S.W.2d 274 (1996).

Where appraised estate lands were offered at a public sale, but there were no bidders and the court ordered the property sold a year later under the provisions of former statute free of appraisement, an appraiser named in the original order of sale would be a qualified purchaser at the second sale, as his appraisal would have no effect or bearing thereon. Norwood v. Heaslett, 218 Ark. 286, 235 S.W.2d 955 (1951) (decision under prior law).

Under §28-49-101, real property is an asset in the hands of an administrator only when the court finds that it should be sold, mortgaged, leased, or exchanged for purposes stated in §28-51-103. Keenan v. Peevy, 267 Ark. 218, 590 S.W.2d 259 (1979).

Real estate vests in the heirs of a decedent, subject to a widow's dower and to sale for the payment of debts, the preservation or protection of the assets of an estate, the distribution of the estate, or any other purpose in the best interest of the estate; the sale, however, is not necessarily free of the widow's dower, and such a sale is not void for want of jurisdiction, but is simply inoperative as far as the widow's dower is concerned. Keenan v. Peevy, 267 Ark. 218, 590 S.W.2d 259 (1979).

Cited: Cranna v. Long, 225 Ark. 153, 279 S.W.2d 828 (1955).

A sale on second offering in less than 12 months could not be attacked collaterally where the land sold for two-thirds of its appraised value. Long v. Hoffman, 103 Ark. 574, 148 S.W. 245 (1912) (decision under prior law).

Failure of administrator to have an appraisement made did not render the sale void when attacked on that ground in a collateral proceeding. Fisher v. Cowan, 205 Ark. 722, 170 S.W.2d 603 (1943) (decision under prior law).

The failure of an administrator to have land appraised before selling it did not render a sale void if it was confirmed by the court. Bell v. Green, 38 Ark. 78 (1881) (decision under prior law).

A probate sale of real estate for the payment of debts was held to be a judicial sale and passed no title till confirmed, and confirmation had to be proved, it could not be presumed. Apel v. Kelsey, 47 Ark. 413, 2 S.W. 102 (1886) (decision under prior law).

The recital in an order of a probate court approving a sale that the real estate had been duly appraised by “three disinterested capable persons” amounted to a finding that appraisers were qualified under the requirements of former statute. Fisher v. Cowan, 205 Ark. 722, 170 S.W.2d 603 (1943) (decision under prior law).

A sale by an appraiser was voidable even after confirmation at the instance of the heirs. Brown v. Nelms, 86 Ark. 368, 112 S.W. 373 (1908) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Doss v. Taylor, 244 Ark. 252, 424 S.W.2d 541 (1968); Harper v. Cannon, 2009 Ark. App. 785 (2009); Rice v. Seals, 2010 Ark. App. 393, 377 S.W.3d 416 (2010).

An order for sale, mortgage, or lease shall remain in force until terminated by the court, but no sale shall be made after six (6) months from the date of the order unless the real property shall have been reappraised under order of the court within thirty (30) days preceding the sale.

Ark. L. Rev.

Probate Code Amendments, 5 Ark. L. Rev. 377.

A conveyance of land by an administrator pursuant to an order by him obtained after his discharge was invalid, and confirmation after the administration was closed would not have added anything to it. Bender v. Bean, 52 Ark. 132, 12 S.W. 180, modified, 52 Ark. 146, 12 S.W. 241 (1889) (decision under prior law).

A probate court could make no order for the sale of land after an order settling an estate and closing the administration had been made, without first setting the order aside. Abramson v. Rogers, 97 Ark. 189, 133 S.W. 836 (1911) (decision under prior law).

Probate sales could be made only in the manner and for the purpose prescribed by statute. Livingston v. Cochran, 33 Ark. 294 (1878); Planters' Mut. Ins. Ass'n v. Harris, 96 Ark. 222, 131 S.W. 949 (1910) (decisions under prior law).

It was error to order more lands sold than was requested in the petition. Mays v. Rogers, 37 Ark. 155 (1881) (decision under prior law).

Where an order of a probate court for the sale of land of an estate was defective, the court was not authorized to amend it at a subsequent term so as to accurately describe the land. Bouldin v. Jennings, 92 Ark. 299, 122 S.W. 639 (1909) (decision under prior law).

The credit in probate sales of land for the payment of debts was not limited to six months, as in other judicial sales, but was left to the sound discretion of the court. Grider v. Apperson & Co., 38 Ark. 388 (1882) (decision under prior law).

Where the property of an insolvent corporation was sold at a judicial sale for approximately 80% of its true value, a minority stockholder did not meet his burden of proof that the public sale price of the property was grossly inadequate and that the chancellor, therefore, abused his discretion in refusing to set aside the sale. Keirs v. Mt. Comfort Enterprises, Inc., 266 Ark. 523, 587 S.W.2d 8 (1979).

It was erroneous for a probate court to make an order for the sale of lands to pay debts, on the application of an administrator, without the notice required by statute; however, such an order was not void for want of such notice, the proceeding being in rem and the court having jurisdiction of the subject matter. Rogers v. Wilson, 13 Ark. (8 English) 507 (1853) (decision under prior law).

The omission to give any notice of an intended application for the sale of land did not affect the jurisdiction of a court to order or confirm a sale. Apel v. Kelsey, 47 Ark. 413, 2 S.W. 102 (1886) (decision under prior law).

Where record was silent with respect to any fact necessary to give a court jurisdiction, it would be presumed that the court acted within its jurisdiction. Kulbeth v. Drew County Timber Co., 125 Ark. 291, 188 S.W. 810 (1916) (decision under prior law).

Probate courts had jurisdiction to order the sale of real estate to pay debts of an estate in accordance with the jurisdiction conferred by former statute. Sullivan v. Times Publishing Co., 181 Ark. 27, 24 S.W.2d 865 (1930) (decision under prior law).

Where two loans totalled an amount less than that authorized by a probate order, and the order did not preclude the borrowing of a lesser amount initially, the second loan was valid, since subsection (f) provides that an order permitting property to be mortgaged shall remain in force until terminated by the court. Rowland v. Farm Credit Bank, 41 Ark. App. 79, 848 S.W.2d 433 (1993).

When a sale failed for the lack of the required bid of the appraised value of the lands, no new order was required condemning the lands. Burgett v. Apperson, 52 Ark. 213, 12 S.W. 559 (1889) (decision under prior law).

An order for sale was presumed regular and was not subject to collateral attack. Jackson v. Gorman, 70 Ark. 88, 66 S.W. 346 (1902) (decision under prior law).

An order of a probate court directing the sale of decedent's realty for the payment of debts which did not set out any of the requirements prescribed by statute as preliminary requisites for the sale did not authorize presumption as to regularity of sale in action to set the sale aside on ground of fraud. Crider v. Simmons, 192 Ark. 1075, 96 S.W.2d 471 (1936) (decision under prior law).

A private sale of the lands of a decedent, made under an order of a probate court, for the payment of his debts, was not void when confirmed. Apel v. Kelsey, 52 Ark. 341, 12 S.W. 703 (1889) (decision under prior law).

The validity of an order of a probate court for the sale of lands to pay debts did not depend upon the sufficiency of the petition for sale, for the order was a judgment in rem of a court having original jurisdiction of the subject matter; rather, the judgment had to be corrected on appeal or certiorari when the petition was insufficient. Adams v. Thomas, 44 Ark. 267 (1884) (decision under prior law).

The sale of real estate under an order made without notice, and otherwise irregular and grossly defective, was not a nullity and would, upon its confirmation, divest the title of the heirs. Montgomery v. Johnson, 31 Ark. 74 (1876); Harper v. Wisner, 126 Ark. 443, 190 S.W. 569 (1916) (decisions under prior law).

Cited: Doss v. Taylor, 244 Ark. 252, 424 S.W.2d 541 (1968); Harper v. Cannon, 2009 Ark. App. 785 (2009).

Circuit court properly refused to apply this section to the judicial sale of property to satisfy an attorney-fee lien as the court was the seller, not the personal representative of the decedent.Howard v. Adams, 2016 Ark. App. 597, 508 S.W.3d 890 (2016).

Cited: Tsann Kuen Enters. Co. v. Campbell, 355 Ark. 110, 129 S.W.3d 822 (2003).

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

Ark. L. Rev.

Notices Under the Probate Code, 8 Ark. L. Rev. 324.

A sale not confirmed was void and conferred no title on a purchaser. Bell v. Green, 38 Ark. 78 (1881) (decision under prior law).

Since there was no confirmation of the leases or sale of mineral interests in accordance with this section, the sale and leases of the mineral interests were not complete and binding, and their validity could be questioned. Jackson v. Braden, 290 Ark. 117, 717 S.W.2d 206 (1986).

It was fraud for an administrator to be interested in as purchase at his own sale, and equity would set aside the sale. Mock v. Pleasants, 34 Ark. 63 (1879) (decision under prior law).

Where an administrator, without compliance with statutes relating to sale of decedent's realty for payment of debts, sold realty to an attorney who had prepared the petition for sale and who purchased it for the administrator's wife, and after payment of widow's share and fee to the attorney, the administrator retained the balance as his fee, though no actual fraud appeared to have been contemplated, legal fraud warranting setting aside the probate court's judgment and the sale resting thereon was sufficiently established. Crider v. Simmons, 192 Ark. 1075, 96 S.W.2d 471 (1936) (decision under prior law).

An attorney of an administrator, who prepared and filed the petition and obtains an order for the sale of property of a deceased was not allowed to purchase at the sale. West v. Waddill, 33 Ark. 575 (1878) (decision under prior law).

An executor or administrator could not purchase any portion of an estate, inasmuch as, in equity, he was held to be a trustee for the heirs, legatees, and creditors. Wright v. Campbell & Strong, 27 Ark. 637 (1872) (decision under prior law).

A probate judge should not be allowed to purchase lands at a sale ordered by himself, and a purchaser of his bid, with knowledge that he was a judge and that he made the order of sale and purchased for his own benefit, was not an innocent purchaser. Livingston v. Cochran, 33 Ark. 294 (1878) (decision under prior law).

Once a trial judge rejects the report on the public sale of estate land, the status of the parties who had bid for the land can no longer be described as interested parties; at best, their position is that of potential bidders at any future sale, and hence they have no standing to contest a petition on behalf of the heirs of an estate. Estate of Hodges v. Wilkie, 14 Ark. App. 297, 688 S.W.2d 307 (1985).

Due appointment and qualification of the personal representative;

Correctness of the proceedings; and

Authority of the personal representative to execute the instrument.

Where the lands of a decedent were sold under, and in pursuance of, the judgment of a probate court, the sale vested legal title in the purchaser, and no advantage could be taken by the heirs of any defect in the deed of conveyance. Sturdy v. Jacoway, 19 Ark. (6 Barber) 499 (1858) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 137; 1951, No. 255, § 11; 1967, No. 287, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2714; Acts 2003, No. 177, § 3.

Parties to Proceedings.

28-51-302. Appraisal.

(1)Before a personal representative shall sell real property, he or she shall have it appraised by three (3) disinterested persons, selected by him or her, unless appointed by the court, who are well informed concerning the value of real property in the vicinity.

However, unless there is an objection by an heir or beneficiary of the estate, the court may approve the appointment of one (1) appraiser to appraise the real property.

The appraisers shall appraise the real property at its full and fair value and immediately deliver the appraisal certified by them under oath to the personal representative.

The appraisal shall be filed with the clerk prior to the rendition of the order authorizing the sale.

In connection with the hearing on the petition for the order of sale, or prior to the hearing, upon proper notice, the court, upon evidence heard, may approve, modify, or reject the appraisal.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 139; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2716; Acts 1995, No. 406, § 1.

28-51-303. Order for sale, mortgage, or lease.

The order for sale, mortgage, or lease shall describe the property to be sold, mortgaged, or leased and may designate the sequence in which the several parcels shall be sold, mortgaged, or leased.

(1)The order shall contain appropriate provisions with respect to the bond of the personal representative and shall direct whether the property shall be sold at private sale or public auction, and if the latter, the place or places of sale.

(A)If the sale is to be at public auction, the property shall be sold for not less than three-fourths (¾) of its appraised value.

A private sale shall be for not less than the appraised value thereof.

The order shall direct whether the sale shall be for cash or for cash and deferred payments and the terms on which such deferred payments are to be made.

If real property is to be mortgaged, the order shall fix the maximum amount of principal debt which may be secured, the maximum rate of interest which the debt may bear, and the earliest and latest date of maturity and shall direct the purpose for which the proceeds shall be used.

Except in the case of an oil, gas, or other mineral lease, real property of an estate may not be leased by a personal representative for a term exceeding three (3) years. The order authorizing the lease shall specify the maximum term thereof.

In appropriate cases the order shall specify restrictions, reservations, terms, and conditions under which the property is to be sold, mortgaged, or leased.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 140; 1951, No. 255, § 11a; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2717.

28-51-304. Sales at public auction.

(1)In all sales of real property at public auction, the personal representative shall give notice of the sale, particularly describing the property to be sold, and stating the time, place, and terms of sale.

The notice shall be printed one (1) time a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the county in which the property is situated.

(A)If the notice covers property located in more than one (1) county, the notice shall be published as prescribed in this section in each county in which the property is situated.

However, if the notice embraces tracts which are contiguous and lie in more than one (1) county, the notice shall be published in the county in which the greater part in value is situated.

If the property is appraised at not more than five hundred dollars ($500), in lieu of newspaper publication the personal representative may post the notice in the courthouse of each county in which the property is situated in a conspicuous place near a principal entrance, post the notice on each tract to be sold, and post three (3) additional notices in each county in which the property is situated.

If the tracts to be sold are contiguous and lie in more than one (1) county, the sale may be made in the county in which the greater part of the land, in value, is situated. Otherwise, each tract of land shall be sold in the county in which it is situated.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 141; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2718.

28-51-305. Report and confirmation.

Within ten (10) days after making any sale, mortgage, or lease of real property, the personal representative shall make a verified report to the court of his or her proceeding, with proof of publication or posting in case the sale is made at public auction. The report shall state that the personal representative did not directly or indirectly acquire any beneficial interest in the real property, or the lease thereof, or, if he or she acquired any such interest, specific facts showing that it was acquired in conformity with the provisions of the Probate Code.

An interested person may file written objections to the confirmation.

(1)(A)The court shall examine the report and, if satisfied that the sale, mortgage, or lease has been at a price and on terms advantageous to the estate and in all respects made in conformity with law, shall confirm the sale, mortgage, or lease and order the personal representative to execute and deliver to the person entitled a deed, mortgage, lease, or other appropriate instrument.

However, no report shall be confirmed within five (5) days after the filing unless all persons interested in the estate, either in person or by attorney or guardian, shall consent in writing to the confirmation.

The instrument shall refer to the order of sale, mortgage, or lease by its date and the court by which it was made, shall transfer to the grantee, mortgagee, or lessee all the right, title, and interest of the decedent granted by the instrument, and shall discharge from liability for all debts and obligations incident to the administration of the estate, except encumbrances assumed.

If satisfied that the sale, mortgage, or lease is not advantageous to the estate or has not been made in conformity with law, the court may reject the sale, mortgage, or lease or require a reexecution of the order upon such terms and conditions as it may direct.

However, when the order is for private sale, mortgage, or lease, the court may approve the report and confirm the sale immediately, either by endorsement upon the report of sale, mortgage, or lease or by separate order of confirmation. If approval and confirmation is by endorsement upon the report, the report, with endorsement, shall be recorded.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 142; 1967, No. 287, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2719.

28-51-306. Execution of conveyance — Recordation.

Upon the confirmation of any sale, mortgage, or lease in accordance with §28-51-305, the personal representative shall execute, acknowledge, and deliver a conveyance to the grantee or mortgagee or join the lessee in the execution of a lease according to the order of confirmation.

A certified copy of the order may be recorded with the deed or other instrument in the office of the recorder of the county where the land lies and shall be prima facie evidence of the:

The foregoing provision shall in no way limit the effect of the provisions of §28-51-109.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 143; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2720.

28-51-307. Expenses of sale.

In connection with the sale, mortgage, lease, or exchange of property, the court may authorize the personal representative to pay, out of the proceeds realized or out of the estate, the customary and reasonable auctioneers' and brokers' fees and any necessary expenses for abstracting, title insurance, survey, revenue stamps, and other necessary costs and expenses in connection therewith.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 144; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2721.

28-51-308. Platting and dedication.

When it is for the best interest of the estate in order to dispose of real property, the court, upon application by the personal representative or other interested person, may authorize the personal representative, either alone or together with other owners, to plat any land belonging to the estate in accordance with the statutes in regard to platting and to dedicate lands in connection therewith.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 145; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2722.

28-51-309. Waiver of landlord's lien.

In order to enable a lessee, tenant, or sharecropper on lands of the estate to obtain money, advances, or supplies with which to plant, cultivate, or harvest crops growing or to be grown on lands of the estate, a personal representative, upon the authorization of or approval by the court, may waive or subordinate, in whole or in part, a landlord's lien held by the estate.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 138; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2715.